District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.27

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464 ; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 , et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) , or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) .

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 28, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.